csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTI_Cnj_oo.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwegwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaagwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiinigwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiigwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwiingen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowegwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaagwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoonigwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoogwen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowangen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowiingen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaambaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitoosiiwegibanen,wanitoosiiwegobanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwambanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaagobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiinigobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiigobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwaangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiiwiingibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaambaanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitoowegibanen,wanitoowegobanen]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowambanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaagobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoonigobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoogobanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowangibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowiingibanen
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiweg
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosigwaa
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosinig
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosig
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwaang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosing
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyeg
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaad
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoonid
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitood
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyaang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyang
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoong
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwaambaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitoosiwegiban,wanitoosiwegoban]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwamban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosigwaaban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosinigoban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosigoban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwaangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosiwangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoosingiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyaambaan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0Sg/0Pl: [wanitooyegiban,wanitooyegoban]
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyamban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoowaapan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObv/3PlObv+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoonipan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoopan
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Excl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyaangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+Incl+0Sg/0Pl: wanitooyangiban
     wanitoon+VTI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+X+0Sg/0Pl: wanitoongiban
